Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5278.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 30 of the General Laws entitled "MILITARY AFFAIRS AND
DEFENSE" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 30.3
THE MILITARY CHILD ACT
30-30.3-1. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Military Child Act."
30-30.3-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Military-connected student” means a student who is the dependent of either a person
in the active military service of the United States or in a full-time status during active service with
a force of the Rhode Island national guard.
30-30.3-3. Advance enrollment.
A military-connected student whose parent or guardian is being relocated to this state under
military orders and is transferred to or is pending transfer to a military installation within the state,
shall be deemed to be a resident pupil of a school system of a city or town for the purposes of
enrollment. The Rhode Island board of education shall permit military-connected students to enroll
preliminarily by remote registration without charge and shall not require the parents or guardians
of the military-connected student or the student himself or herself to physically appear at a location
within the district to register the student, if the parents or guardians present evidence of military

orders that a parent or guardian will be stationed in this state during the current or following school
year. The parents or guardians may use an address within the school district where the military-
connected student is to be enrolled of a temporary on-base billeting facility, a purchased or leased
home or apartment, or federal government or public-private venture off-base military housing.
Proof of required residency shall not be required at the time of the remote registration but shall be
required within ten (10) days of the student’s attendance in the school system of the city or town
where the student resides. Such advance enrollment policies related to a child of a military family
member shall also apply if the enrolling student is transferring with a Section 504 plan, an
individualized family service plan, or an individualized education plan.
30-30.3-4. Open enrollment.
(a) Military-connected students who are the dependent children of a member of the active
uniformed military services of the United States on full-time active-duty status and students who
are the dependent children of a member of the military reserve on active duty orders shall be eligible
for admission to the school district of their choice regardless of the capacity of the district.
(b) Students shall be eligible if:
(1) At least one parent of the student has a Department of Defense-issued identification
card; and
(2) At least one parent can provide evidence that the parent will be on active duty status or
active duty orders, meaning the parent will be temporarily transferred in compliance with official
orders to another location in support of combat, contingency operation or a natural disaster
requiring the use of orders for more than thirty (30) consecutive days.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001112/SUB A
========
LC001112/SUB A - Page 2 of 3